South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4250.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 8-13-1314(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Within an election cycle, a candidate or anyone acting on his behalf shall not solicit or accept, and a person shall not give or offer to give to a candidate or person acting on the candidate's behalf: (1) a contribution which exceeds: (a) three thousand five hundred dollars in the case of a candidate for statewide office; or (b) three thousand five hundred dollars in the aggregate for statewide candidates elected jointly pursuant to Section 8, Article IV of the South Carolina Constitution, 1895; or (c) one thousandthree thousand five hundred dollars in the case of a candidate for any other office; (2) a cash contribution from an individual unless the cash contribution does not exceed twenty-five dollars and is accompanied by a record of the amount of the contribution and the name and address of the contributor; (3) a contribution from, whether directly or indirectly, a registered lobbyist if that lobbyist engages in lobbying the public office or public body for which the candidate is seeking election; (4) contributions for two elective offices simultaneously, except as provided in Section 8-13-1318. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----